Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.160

Appropriations lapse at end of fiscal year—Exception.

All appropriations for any school district upon which their budget is based shall lapse at the end of the fiscal year. At the expiration of said period all appropriations shall become null and void and any claim presented thereafter against any such appropriation for the fiscal year just closed shall be provided for in the appropriation for the next fiscal year: PROVIDED, That this shall not prevent payments upon incompleted improvements in progress at the close of the fiscal year.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 16. Formerly RCW 28A.65.475.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.